dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
aizklimst/FEC23458-J po:darbv15t
aizkustēt/FDB2357Jfdb+&j- po:darbv33t
aizlenkt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
aizplest/8HEB145$hebJ-* po:darbv14t
aizputeņot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
aizsalt/FDB2357-J po:darbv15t
aizsteberēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
aizsviest/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
aizšļākt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
apdarināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
apdrupt/ADB0357J- po:darbv13t
apdurt/8EB135J9- po:darbv14t
apglūnēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
apgrūst/8EB04J9- po:darbv14t
aplaipot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
aplaist/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
aplikt/FDB0358Jfdb)+-* po:darbv12t
aplīt/GIB3%58-J po:darbv15t
appurkšķināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
aprāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
aprullēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
apsarkt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
apsēst/FEB2458febJ-j@$%* po:darbv15t
apsist/HEB0458heb)$-*j po:darbv11t
apsliet/8AEB035J- po:darbv14t
apšķīst/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
aptriekt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
aptrupēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
aptvaicēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
atdabūt/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv25t
atgrūst/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
atgult/FEB02358feb-+J*j po:darbv15t
atkairināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
atlīt/GIB3%8-J po:darbv15t
atmaskot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
atmost/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
atpirkt/FDB0358Jfdb)+-&j po:darbv12t
atplest/8HEB145$hebJ-j* po:darbv14t
atrīt/AIB0358J-%1 po:darbv11t
atrukšķēt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv33t
atsaldēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
atspraust/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
atsvērt/7DB035J9- po:darbv14t
atvēdināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
atžvadzināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
augšāmcelt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
bonēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
brukt/FDB0358J- po:darbv13t
dudināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
ecēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
emitēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
ieaust/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
ieceļot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
iedot/FEB0358Jfeb)+*j-
ieelpināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
iekātot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
ieliet/AEB0358Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
ielīt/GIB35%8-J po:darbv15t
ieņurrāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
ieostīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
ieplūst/FEB2458J- po:darbv15t
iesēst/FEB2458feb-*Jj@$%* po:darbv15t
iesīkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
iestāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
iešaudīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
iešļākt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
ieziest/8EB045$ebJ9(-*j po:darbv14t
iezobot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
izbrēkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
izdarīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
izdvašot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
izhlorēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
izliekt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
izlobīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
izpaust/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
izprecēt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv33t
izrāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
izreklamēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
izskaitīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
izslēgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
izurgt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
izvaukšķēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
izvest/FIB0458J- po:darbv11t
jozt/7DB135dbJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
kaplēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
kurkt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
ķerstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
lodāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
mest/HEB0458Jheb)$-*j po:darbv11t
metilēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
nocelt/8EB035ebJ9()+-*j po:darbv14t
nočaukstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
nodesot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
nogaust/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
nokaplēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
noklunkšķināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
nokrimst/FEC2458J- po:darbv12t
nolūgt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
nomaskēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
noplātīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
norūgt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
nosēkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
nosliekt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
nosprāgt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
nosprūst/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
nostrutot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
novēdināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
noziepēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
pabērt/7DB035J9- po:darbv14t
pacitēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
padusēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
pagaust/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
pagrūst/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
pakodināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
pakveldināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
pamanevrēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pamost/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
parakstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
parast/HIB%457J- po:darbv13t
pārbrēkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
pārdainot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
pārfilmēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
pārmest/HEB0458Jjheb)$-* po:darbv11t
pārpatentēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pārplānot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
pārrāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
pārskatīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
pārskūt/8EB035ebJ9()+-* po:darbv14t
pārsliekt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
pāršķīst/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
pārvircot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
pasēdēt/FGDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv33t
pasliet/8AEB035aebJ)+-*j po:darbv14t
pašūpināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
patiekt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
pavērst/AEB1458J$aeb!$*j- po:darbv11t
pavīlēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pazvanīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
piecirst/FEB0458Jfeb)$-jj po:darbv12t
piekost/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
piekukuļot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
pieplucināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
pieradināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
pierāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
piesēst/FEB2458feb-Jj@$%* po:darbv15t
piesīkt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
piespriest/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
piešķibīt/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darb23t
postīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
rāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
reklasificēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
rēkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
sabriest/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
sadārdēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
saglumēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
sagudrot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
samākt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
samist/HEB0458J- po:darbv13t
saputināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
saputrot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
sapūžņot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
saraukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
sasēst/FEB2458feb-Jj@$%* po:darbv15t
sašķīst/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
sašķīt/9EB%35^Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
savilgt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
savilnīt/HDB1357J- po:darb23t
sažņaugt/8EB035ebJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
sēst/FEB2458feb-Jj@$%* po:darbv15t
skanēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
šķērst/8IB045$eb9(-* po:darbv14t
šņāpt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
teleportēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
tiekt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
uzdegt/8DB035JA- po:darbv14t
uzgrabināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
uzkalpot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
uzlaist/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
uzlasīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
uzlīt/GIB3%8-J po:darbv15t
uzmīt/09EB%35^J-Aa po:darbv11t
uzrāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
uzsprukt/FDB0358J- po:darbv13t
uzspulgot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
uzšņakstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
uztīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
uztvanēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
uzzīst/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
